District of Columbia statutes.
1-203.01

District charter preamble.

The charter for the District of Columbia set forth in subchapter IV of this chapter shall establish the means of governance of the District following its acceptance by a majority of the registered qualified electors of the District voting thereon in the charter referendum held with respect thereto.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 784, Pub. L. 93-198, title III, § 301

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-551.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-203.
1973 Ed., § 1-123.